en: Mountain cheeses
de: Bergkäse
fi: vuorijuustot
fr: Fromages de montagne
hr: Planinski sirevi
it: Formaggio di montagna, Formaggio d'alpeggio, Formaggio di malga
nl: Bergkazen

en: Tomme cheese from cow's milk, Tomme
de: Tomme
fr: Tommes, tomes
hr: Tomme sir od kravljeg mlijeka
it: Formaggio Tomme

en: Reduced fat Tomme cheese, Tomme cheese reduced fat around 13% fat
fr: Tomme allégée en matière grasse, Tomme allégée en matière grasse environ 13% MG

en: Zamorski, Zamorski Cheese
pl: Zamojski Cheese

en: Alderman
fi: Oltermanni
zh: 奥尔特曼尼‌奶酪

en: Tomme cheese from Savoy
fr: Tomme de Savoie, Tommes de Savoie
hr: Tomme savojski sir
it: Formaggio Tomme della Savoia

fr: Gruyère
en: Gruyère

en: Mushrooms and their products, Fungi and their products
bg: Гъби и гъбени продукти
ca: Bolets i productes derivats
de: Pilze und Pilzprodukte
es: Setas y sus productos, Setas y derivados, Hongos y sus productos, Hongos y derivados
fi: sienet ja sienituotteet
fr: Champignons et produits dérivés
he: פטריות ומוצריהן
hr: Gljive i njihovi proizvodi
hu: Gombák és belőle készült termékek
it: Funghi e prodotti derivati
lt: Grybai ir jų produktai
nl: Paddestoel- en afgeleide producten
pt: Cogumelos e derivados
ru: Грибы и продукты из них
tr: Mantar ve mantar ürünleri

en: Mushrooms, Fungi
bg: Гъби
ca: Bolets
da: Svampe
de: Pilze
es: Setas, Hongos
fi: sienet
fr: Champignons
he: פטריות
hr: Gljive
hu: Gombák
it: Funghi
ja: きのこ
la: Fungi
lt: Grybai
nl: Paddestoelen
pl: Grzyby
pt: Cogumelos
ru: Грибы
tr: Mantar

en: Fresh mushrooms, Fresh fungi
bg: Пресни гъби
de: Frische Pilze
es: Setas frescas, Hongos frescos
fi: Tuoreet sienet
fr: Champignons frais
hr: Svježe gljive
it: Funghi freschi
nl: Verse paddestoelen
pl: Świeże grzyby

en: Bloody milk caps, Lactarius sanguifluus
es: Rovellones, Rovellón, Lactarius sanguifluus
fr: Lactaires sanguins, Lactarius sanguifluus
hr: Krvave kape od mlijeka
la: Lactarius sanguifluus
nl: Bloedmelkzwammen

en: Champignon mushrooms, Common mushrooms, White mushrooms, White button mushrooms, Button mushrooms, Agaricus bisporus, Cultivated mushrooms
bg: Печурки
de: Champignons
es: Champiñones, Champiñones de París, Champiñones comunes, Champiñones blancos, Agaricus bisporus
fi: herkkusieniä
fr: Champignons de Paris, Agaricus bisporus, Champignons de couche
hr: Gljive šampinjoni
it: Funghi champignon
ja: マッシュルーム, ツクリタケ
la: Agaricus bisporus
lt: Pievagrybiai
nl: Champignons
pl: Pieczarki
ru: Шампиньоны

en: Field mushrooms
fr: Champignons rosés des prés

fr: Champignon de Paris frais
nl: Champignons (vers)

en: Quartered champignon mushrooms, Quartered common mushrooms, Quartered white mushrooms, Quartered white button mushrooms, Quartered button mushrooms
de: Geviertelte Champignons
es: Champiñones en cuartos, Champiñones cuarteados, Champiñones de París en cuartos, Champiñones de París cuarteados
fr: Quartiers de champignons de Paris
hr: Šampinjone narezane na četvrtine
nl: Gevierendeelde Champignons

en: Sliced champignon mushrooms, Sliced common mushrooms, Sliced white mushrooms, Sliced white button mushrooms, Sliced button mushrooms
de: Champignonscheiben, Champignons in Scheiben
es: Champiñones laminados, Champiñones de París laminados
fi: herkkusienet siivuina
fr: Champignons de Paris émincés
hr: Narezane šampinjone
it: Funghi champignon a fette, Champignon a fette
nl: Gesneden champignons

en: Whole champignon mushrooms, Whole common mushrooms, Whole white mushrooms, Whole white button mushrooms, Whole button mushrooms
de: Ganze Champignons
es: Champiñones enteros, Champiñones de París enteros
fi: kokonaiset herkkusienet
fr: Champignons de Paris entiers
hr: Cijelih šampinjona
it: Funghi champignon interi, Champignon interi
nl: Hele champignons

en: Boiled button mushrooms, Boiled cultivated mushrooms, Button mushrooms cooked in water, Cultivated mushrooms cooked in water
fr: Champignons de Paris bouillis, Champignons de couche bouillis, Champignons de Paris cuits à l'eau, Champignons de couche cuits à l'eau

en: Button mushroom sautéed without fat, cultivated mushroom sautéed without fat, Button mushroom pan-fried without fat, cultivated mushroom pan-fried without fat
fr: Champignons de Paris sautés sans matière grasse, Champignons de couche sautés sans matière grasse, Champignons de Paris poêlés sans matière grasse, Champignons de couche poêlés sans matière grasse

en: Chestnut mushrooms
nl: Kastanjechampignons, Kastagne champignons